zh-TW: 支架介面系統: Beeline Moto; Garmin 脊椎夾; Garmin Zumo 支架; 一般; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; RAM AMPS 模式; RAM B 尺寸球 (1"); RAM C 尺寸球 (1.5"); SP Connect; TomTom Rider 支架; 通用; 其他
lt-LT: Tvirtinimo sąsajos sistema: Beeline Moto; Garmin Spine spaustukėlis; Garmin Zumo laikiklis; Bendras; „MagSafe“; Peak Design; Quad Lock; RAM AMPS šablonas; RAM B dydžio rutulys (1"); RAM C dydžio rutulys (1,5"); SP Connect; TomTom Rider laikiklis; Universalus; Kita
fi: Kiinnitysrajapintajärjestelmä: Beeline Moto; Garmin selkäpidike; Garmin Zumo-teline; Yleinen; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; RAM AMPS-kuvio; RAM B-kokopallo (1"); RAM C-kokopallo (1,5"); SP Connect; TomTom Rider-teline; Yleinen; Muu
cs: Systém montážního rozhraní: Beeline Moto; Klip Garmin Spine; Držák Garmin Zumo; Obecný; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; Vzor RAM AMPS; Kulička RAM velikosti B (1"); Kulička RAM velikosti C (1,5"); SP Connect; Držák TomTom Rider; Univerzální; Jiné
th: ระบบอินเทอร์เฟซการติดตั้ง: Beeline Moto; คลิปหลัง Garmin; แท่นวาง Garmin Zumo; ทั่วไป; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; รูปแบบ RAM AMPS; ลูกบอล RAM ขนาด B (1"); ลูกบอล RAM ขนาด C (1.5"); SP Connect; แท่นวาง TomTom Rider; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
de: Halterungs-Schnittstellensystem: Beeline Moto; Garmin Rückenclip; Garmin Zumo Halterung; Generisch; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; RAM AMPS Muster; RAM B-Größe Kugel (1"); RAM C-Größe Kugel (1,5"); SP Connect; TomTom Rider Halterung; Universell; Sonstiges
ru: Система монтажного интерфейса: Beeline Moto; Зажим Garmin Spine; Держатель Garmin Zumo; Универсальный; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; Шаблон RAM AMPS; Шар RAM размера B (1"); Шар RAM размера C (1,5"); SP Connect; Держатель TomTom Rider; Универсальное; Другой
en: Mount interface system: Beeline Moto; Garmin Spine clip; Garmin Zumo cradle; Generic; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; RAM AMPS pattern; RAM B-size ball (1"); RAM C-size ball (1.5"); SP Connect; TomTom Rider cradle; Universal; Other
it: Sistema di interfaccia di montaggio: Beeline Moto; Clip Garmin Spine; Supporto Garmin Zumo; Generico; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; Schema RAM AMPS; Sfera RAM dimensione B (1"); Sfera RAM dimensione C (1,5"); SP Connect; Supporto TomTom Rider; Universale; Altro
bg-BG: Система на интерфейса за монтаж: Beeline Moto; Garmin Spine клип; Garmin Zumo стойка; Универсален; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; RAM AMPS модел; RAM B-размер топка (1"); RAM C-размер топка (1,5"); SP Connect; TomTom Rider стойка; Универсален; Други
nb: Monteringsgrensesnittsystem: Beeline Moto; Garmin Spine-klips; Garmin Zumo-holder; Generisk; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; RAM AMPS-mønster; RAM B-størrelse kule (1"); RAM C-størrelse kule (1,5"); SP Connect; TomTom Rider-holder; Universal; Annet
el: Σύστημα διεπαφής βάσης: Beeline Moto; Κλιπ Garmin Spine; Βάση Garmin Zumo; Γενικό; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; Μοτίβο RAM AMPS; Σφαίρα RAM μεγέθους B (1"); Σφαίρα RAM μεγέθους C (1,5"); SP Connect; Βάση TomTom Rider; Καθολικής χρήσης; Άλλο
hr-HR: Sustav sučelja nosača: Beeline Moto; Garmin Spine kopča; Garmin Zumo držač; Generički; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; RAM AMPS uzorak; RAM B-veličina kugle (1"); RAM C-veličina kugle (1,5"); SP Connect; TomTom Rider držač; Univerzalno; Ostalo
pt-PT: Sistema de interface de montagem: Beeline Moto; Clip Garmin Spine; Suporte Garmin Zumo; Genérico; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; Padrão RAM AMPS; Esfera RAM tamanho B (1"); Esfera RAM tamanho C (1,5"); SP Connect; Suporte TomTom Rider; Universal; Outro
tr: Montaj arayüz sistemi: Beeline Moto; Garmin Spine klips; Garmin Zumo yuvası; Genel; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; RAM AMPS deseni; RAM B boyut top (1"); RAM C boyut top (1,5"); SP Connect; TomTom Rider yuvası; Her mekana uygun; Diğer
hu: Rögzítési interfész rendszere: Beeline Moto; Garmin gerinckapocs; Garmin Zumo tartó; Általános; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; RAM AMPS minta; RAM B méretű golyó (1"); RAM C méretű golyó (1,5"); SP Connect; TomTom Rider tartó; Általános; Egyéb
da: Monteringsgrænsefladsystem: Beeline Moto; Garmin Spine-klips; Garmin Zumo holder; Generisk; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; RAM AMPS-mønster; RAM B-størrelse kugle (1"); RAM C-størrelse kugle (1,5"); SP Connect; TomTom Rider holder; Universal; Andet
es: Sistema de interfaz de montaje: Beeline Moto; Clip de columna Garmin; Base Garmin Zumo; Genérico; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; Patrón RAM AMPS; Bola RAM tamaño B (1"); Bola RAM tamaño C (1,5"); SP Connect; Base TomTom Rider; Universal; Otros
ja: マウントインターフェースシステム: Beeline Moto; Garmin スパインクリップ; Garmin Zumoクレードル; 汎用; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; RAM AMPSパターン; RAM Bサイズボール (1インチ); RAM Cサイズボール (1.5インチ); SP Connect; TomTom Riderクレードル; ユニバーサル; その他
ko: 마운트 인터페이스 시스템: 빌라인 모토; 가민 스파인 클립; 가민 주모 크래들; 일반형; MagSafe; 피크 디자인; 쿼드 락; RAM AMPS 패턴; RAM B사이즈 볼 (1인치); RAM C사이즈 볼 (1.5인치); SP 커넥트; 톰톰 라이더 크래들; 범용; 기타
nl: Montage-interfacesysteem: Beeline Moto; Garmin Spine-clip; Garmin Zumo-houder; Algemeen; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; RAM AMPS-patroon; RAM B-maat kogel (1"); RAM C-maat kogel (1,5"); SP Connect; TomTom Rider-houder; Universeel; Andere
zh-CN: 支架接口系统: Beeline Moto; Garmin 脊柱夹; Garmin Zumo 支架; 通用型; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; RAM AMPS 模式; RAM B 型球头 (1"); RAM C 型球头 (1.5"); SP Connect; TomTom Rider 支架; 通用; 其他
sl-SI: Sistem montažnega vmesnika: Beeline Moto; Garmin hrbtenična sponka; Garmin Zumo nosilec; Splošni; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; RAM AMPS vzorec; RAM B-velikost krogle (1"); RAM C-velikost krogle (1,5"); SP Connect; TomTom Rider nosilec; Univerzalno; Drugo
fr: Système d’interface du support: Beeline Moto; Clip Garmin Spine; Support Garmin Zumo; Générique; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; Modèle RAM AMPS; Boule RAM taille B (1"); Boule RAM taille C (1,5"); SP Connect; Support TomTom Rider; Universel; Autre
sk-SK: Systém montážneho rozhrania: Beeline Moto; Spona Garmin Spine; Držiak Garmin Zumo; Všeobecný; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; Vzor RAM AMPS; RAM guľa veľkosti B (1"); RAM guľa veľkosti C (1,5"); SP Connect; Držiak TomTom Rider; Univerzálny; Iné
vi: Hệ thống giao diện giá đỡ: Beeline Moto; Kẹp Garmin Spine; Giá đỡ Garmin Zumo; Chung; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; Mẫu RAM AMPS; Bi RAM cỡ B (1"); Bi RAM cỡ C (1,5"); SP Connect; Giá đỡ TomTom Rider; Phổ quát; Khác
sv: Monteringsgränssnittssystem: Beeline Moto; Garmin Spine-klämma; Garmin Zumo-vagga; Generisk; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; RAM AMPS-mönster; RAM B-storleksboll (1"); RAM C-storleksboll (1,5"); SP Connect; TomTom Rider-vagga; Universell; Övrigt
pt-BR: Sistema de interface de montagem: Beeline Moto; Clipe Garmin Spine; Suporte Garmin Zumo; Genérico; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; Padrão RAM AMPS; Esfera RAM tamanho B (1"); Esfera RAM tamanho C (1,5"); SP Connect; Suporte TomTom Rider; Universal; Outro
pl: System interfejsu montażowego: Beeline Moto; Klips Garmin Spine; Uchwyt Garmin Zumo; Ogólny; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; Wzór RAM AMPS; Kula RAM rozmiaru B (1"); Kula RAM rozmiaru C (1.5"); SP Connect; Uchwyt TomTom Rider; Uniwersalny; Inne
ro-RO: Sistem de interfață de montare: Beeline Moto; Clemă spinală Garmin; Suport Garmin Zumo; Generic; MagSafe; Peak Design; Quad Lock; Model RAM AMPS; Bilă RAM mărimea B (1"); Bilă RAM mărimea C (1,5"); SP Connect; Suport TomTom Rider; Universal; Altele